nb: Bruksområde for kjøretøy: Ytre; Interiør; Skinn; Metall; Plast; Gummi; Møbeltrekk; Vinyl; Hjul; Annet
fr: Domaine d’application des véhicules: Extérieur; Intérieur; Cuir; Métal; Plastique; Caoutchouc; Tapisserie d’ameublement; Vinyl; Roues; Autre
ko: 차량 적용 지역: 외부; 인테리어; 가죽; 금속; 플라스틱; 고무; 실내 커버; 비닐; 휠; 기타
nl: Voertuigtoepassingsgebied: Exterieur; Interieur; Leer; Metaal; Plastic; Rubber; Bekleding; Vinyl; Wielen; Andere
el: Περιοχή εφαρμογής οχήματος: Εξωτερικός; Εσωτερικό; Δερμάτινο; Μέταλλο; Πλαστικό; Καουτσούκ; Ταπετσαρία; Βινύλιο; Τροχοί; Άλλο
zh-CN: 车辆应用领域: 外部; 内部; 皮革; 金属; 塑料; 橡胶; 室内装潢; 乙烯基贴纸; 轮子; 其他
fi: Ajoneuvon sovellusalue: Ulkopuoli; Sisäosa; Nahka; Metalli; Muovi; Kumi; Verhoilu; Vinyyli; Pyörät; Muu
pt-BR: Área de aplicação do veículo: Exterior; Interior; Couro; Metal; Plástico; Borracha; Estofamento; Vinil; Rodas; Outro
sl-SI: Področje uporabe vozila: Zunanjost; Notranjost; Usnje; Kovina; Plastika; Guma; Tapetništvo; Vinil; Kolesa; Drugo
tr: Araç uygulama alanı: Dış; İç mekan; Deri; Metal; Plastik; Kauçuk; Döşeme; Vinil; Tekerlekler; Diğer
hr-HR: Područje primjene u vozilu: Izvana; Unutra; Koža; Metal; Plastika; Guma; Presvlake; Vinil; Kotači; Ostalo
hu: Alkalmazási terület: Külső; Belső; Bőr; Fém; Műanyag; Gumi; Kárpit; Vinil; Kerekek; Egyéb
pt-PT: Área de aplicação de veículo: Exterior; Interior; Pele; Metal; Plástico; Borracha; Estofamento; Vinil; Rodas; Outro
da: Køretøjsanvendelsesområde: Eksteriør; Interiør; Læder; Metal; Plast; Gummi; Polstring; Vinyl; Hjul; Andet
de: Fahrzeuganwendungsbereich: Außen; Inneneinrichtung; Leder; Metall; Kunststoff; Gummi; Polster; Vinyl; Räder; Sonstiges
th: พื้นที่ใช้งานยานพาหนะ: ภายนอก; ภายใน; หนัง; โลหะ; พลาสติก; ยาง; เบาะ; ไวนิล; ล้อ; อื่นๆ
sv: Användningsområde för fordon: Exteriör; Interiör; Läder; Metall; Plast; Gummi; Klädsel; Vinyl; Hjul; Övrigt
it: Area di applicazione del veicolo: Esterna; Interna; Pelle; Metallo; Plastica; Gomma; Rivestimento; Vinile; Ruote; Altro
cs: Oblast použití vozidla: Exteriér; Interiér; Kůže; Kov; Plast; Guma; Čalounění; Vinylové; Kola; Jiné
ro-RO: Zonă de aplicare de pe vehicul: Exterior; Interior; Piele; Metal; Plastic; Cauciuc; Tapițerie; Vinil; Roți; Altele
sk-SK: Oblasť použitia vozidla: Exteriér; Interiér; Koža; Kov; Plast; Guma; Čalúnenie; Vinyl; Kolesá; Iné
pl: Obszar zastosowań pojazdów: Części zewnętrzne; Wnętrze; Skórzane; Metal; Tworzywo sztuczne; Guma; Tapicerka; Winyl; Koła; Inne
ru: Область применения продуктов для автомобилей: Экстерьер; Салон; Кожа; Металл; Пластик; Резина; Обивка; Винил; Колеса; Другое
zh-TW: 車輛應用區域: 外部的; 室內; 皮製; 金屬; 塑膠; 橡膠; 坐椅面料; 乙烯基; 車輪; 其他
en: Vehicle application area: Exterior; Interior; Leather; Metal; Plastic; Rubber; Upholstery; Vinyl; Wheels; Other
lt-LT: Taikoma transporto priemonės sritis: Išorė; Interjeras; Oda; Metalas; Plastikas; Kaučiukas; Apmušalai; Vinilas; Ratai; Kita
ja: 車両における使用エリア: エクステリア; インテリア; レザー; 金属; プラスチック; ゴム; 室内装飾品; ビニール; ホイール; その他
vi: Khu vực ứng dụng xe: Bên ngoài; Nội thất; Da; Kim loại; Nhựa; Cao su; Chất liệu bọc; Nhựa vinyl; Bánh xe; Khác
es: Área de aplicación de vehículos: Exterior; Interior; Cuero; Metal; Plástico; Goma; Tapicería; Vinilo; Ruedas; Otros
bg-BG: Област на приложение на превозното средство: Екстериор; Интериор; Кожа; Метал; Пластмаса; Каучук; Тапицерия; Винил; Колела; Други